Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska48-806
Commissioner; compensation; expenses.

As soon as the same may be legally paid under the Constitution of Nebraska, the compensation of each commissioner shall be four hundred seventy-five dollars per day for each day's time actually engaged in the performance of the duties of his or her office. Each commissioner shall also be paid his or her necessary traveling expenses incurred while away from his or her place of residence upon business of the commission in accordance with sections 81-1174 to 81-1177.

Laws 1947, c. 178, § 6, p. 599;

Laws 1971, LB 822, § 1;

Laws 1976, LB 710, § 1;

Laws 1977, LB 302, § 1;

Laws 1979, LB 444, § 3;

Laws 1981, LB 188, § 1;

Laws 1981, LB 204, § 83;

Laws 1991, LB 856, § 1;

Laws 2007, LB211, § 1;

Laws 2007, LB472, § 5.